Illinois, session 104th, SB1837.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds 5the 4% timber buyer harvest fee is not being fully utilized for 6its original intended purpose of assisting timber growers in 7replacing timber being harvested, thus the General Assembly 8finds the assessment and collection of the 4% timber buyer 9harvest fee should be eliminated.  10    Section 5. The Timber Buyers Licensing Act is amended by 11changing Sections 9a and 11 as follows: 12    (225 ILCS 735/9a)  (from Ch. 111, par. 709a)13    Sec. 9a. Reporting a harvest fee. 14    (a) When a timber buyer buys timber in this State, the 15timber buyer and timber grower shall determine the amount to 16be paid for such timber, or the value of items to be bartered 17for such timber, and the timber buyer shall deduct from the 18payment to the timber grower an amount which equals 4% of the 19purchase price or 4% of the minimum fair market value, as 20determined pursuant to administrative rule, when purchase 21price cannot otherwise be determined and shall forward such 22amount to the Department of Natural Resources.  SB1837- 2 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1    (b) When a timber buyer buys timber in this State, the 2timber buyer shall file a report to the Department on a report 3form provided by the Department. The information provided on 4the report form shall include the amount paid for the timber to 5each timber grower and the 4% that is due to the Department for 6each sale, and any other information that is required by the 7Department pursuant to administrative rule. A timber buyer 8shall provide the timber grower a written or electronic 9payment receipt for each transaction of timber bought from the 10timber grower and keep a duplicate or copy of the payment 11receipt in the timber buyer's records. All timber buyers shall 12provide a written receipt upon request of the Department. 13    (c) (Blank). Every timber grower who utilizes timber 14produced on land the timber grower owns or operates for sawing 15into lumber, for processing, or for resale, shall pay to the 16Department, when the periodic report is submitted, an amount 17equal to 4% of the minimum fair market value of the timber 18utilized during the period. The value of such timber shall be 19determined pursuant to rule of the Department.20    (d) Every timber grower who utilizes timber produced on 21land the timber grower owns or operates for sawing into lumber 22for processing or for resale, shall report periodically, as 23required by this Act or administrative rule of the Department, 24the quantity, value, and species of timber produced and 25utilized by the owner or operator during the reporting period. 26    (e) Subsection Subsections (c) and (d) shall not apply to   SB1837- 3 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1a person who uses the person's own timber for sawing or 2processing for personal use and not for resale. 3    (f) (Blank). The fees required by this Section shall be 4deposited in the Illinois Forestry Development Fund, a special 5fund in the State treasury, for the purposes of the Illinois 6Forestry Development Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-218, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    (225 ILCS 735/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 711)9    Sec. 11. Penalties and fines. All fines and penalties 10associated with violations of this Act or administrative rules 11thereunder, except as otherwise provided in this Act, are 12payable 50% to the Department's Conservation Police Operations 13Assistance Fund and 50% to the Department's Illinois Forestry 14Development Fund. 15    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act any person in 16violation of any of the provisions of this Act, or 17administrative rules thereunder, shall be guilty of a Class A 18misdemeanor.19    (a-5) Any person convicted of violating Section 3 of this 20Act shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and fined at least 21$500 for a first offense and guilty of a Class 4 felony and 22fined at least $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense.23    (a-10) Any person convicted of violating subsection (a) of 24Section 5 is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the aggregate 25value of the timber cut, caused to be cut, or appropriated is   SB1837- 4 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1equal to or less than $500. 2    (a-15) (Blank). Any person convicted of violating 3subsection (a) or (c) of Section 9a is guilty of a Class A 4misdemeanor if the aggregate value of the amount due to the 5Department is equal to or less than $500. 6    (b) Any person convicted of violating subsection (a) of 7Section 5 of this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony if the 8aggregate value of the timber cut, caused to be cut or 9appropriated is over $500 but not more than $2,500.10    (b-2) (Blank). Any person convicted of violating 11subsection (a) or (c) of Section 9a is guilty of a Class 4 12felony if the aggregate value of the amount due to the 13Department is over $500 but not more than $2,500. 14    (b-5) Any person convicted of violating subsection (a) of 15Section 5 of this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony if the 16aggregate value of the timber cut, caused to be cut, or 17appropriated is over $2,500 but not more than $10,000.18    (b-7) (Blank). Any person convicted of violating 19subsection (a) or (c) of Section 9a is guilty of a Class 3 20felony if the aggregate value of the amount due to the 21Department is over $2,500 but not more than $10,000. 22    (b-10) Any person convicted of violating subsection (a) of 23Section 5 of this Act is guilty of a Class 2 felony if the 24aggregate value of the timber cut, caused to be cut, or 25appropriated is over $10,000.26    (b-12) (Blank). Any person convicted of violating   SB1837- 5 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1subsection (a) or (c) of Section 9a is guilty of a Class 2 2felony if the aggregate value of the amount due to the 3Department is over $10,000. 4    (b-15) The aggregate value of the timber cut, caused to be 5cut, or appropriated shall be determined as provided by 6administrative rule.7    (c) A person convicted of violating subsection (b) of 8Section 5 of this Act is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. A 9person convicted of a second or subsequent violation is guilty 10of a Class 4 felony.11    (c-5) A person convicted of violating subsection (c) of 12Section 5 is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 13    (c-10) A person convicted of violating subsection (d) of 14Section 5 is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall be 15assessed a fine of not less than $1,000. A person convicted of 16a second or subsequent violation is guilty of a Class 4 felony 17and shall be assessed a fine of not less than $2,000. 18    (c-15) A person convicted of violating subsection (f) of 19Section 5 is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. 20    (c-20) A person convicted of violating subsection (g) of 21Section 5 is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor. 22    (d) All penalties issued pursuant to subsections (e) and 23(f) shall be deposited in the Illinois Forestry Development 24Fund for the purposes of the Illinois Forestry Development 25Act.26    (e) (Blank). Failure to pay any purchase harvest fee   SB1837- 6 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1required under Section 9a of this Act on the date as required 2by regulation of the Department, there shall be added as a 3penalty an amount equal to 7.5% of the harvest fee due the 4Department for each month or fraction thereof during which 5such failure continues, not to exceed 37.5% in the aggregate. 6This penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty 7determined under this Act or by the circuit court.8    (f) A person convicted of violating subsection (b) or (d) 9of Section 9a shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and 10shall be assessed a penalty in the amount of $25, which shall 11be added to the amount due the Department for each individual 12report. A second or subsequent offense within a 3-year period 13after the date of the first offense is a Class A misdemeanor. 14    (g) All fines required in this Section shall be in 15addition to any other penalty authorized under this Act, the 16Unified Code of Corrections, or imposed by the circuit court.17    (h) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates any 18of the provisions of this Act, or administrative rules 19thereunder, when the person's license has been revoked or 20denied or the person's ability to engage in the activity 21requiring the license has been suspended under Section 13 is 22guilty of: 23        (1) a Class 4 felony if the underlying offense that 24    was committed during a period of revocation or suspension 25    is a misdemeanor; or 26        (2) one classification higher if the underlying   SB1837- 7 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1    offense that was committed during a period of revocation 2    or suspension is a felony. 3(Source: P.A. 103-218, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    Section 10. The Illinois Forestry Development Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5 and 7 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 15/5)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9105)7    Sec. 5. A forest development cost share program is created 8and shall be administered by the Department of Natural 9Resources.10    A timber grower who desires to participate in the cost 11share program shall devise a forest management plan. To be 12eligible to submit a proposed forest management plan, a timber 13grower must own or operate at least 10 contiguous acres of land 14in this State on which timber is produced, except that, no acre 15on which a permanent building is located shall be included in 16calculations of acreage for the purpose of determining 17eligibility. Timber growers with Department approved forest 18management plans covering less than 10 acres in effect on or 19before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 20General Assembly shall continue to be eligible under the 21Illinois Forestry Development Act provisions. The proposed 22forest management plan shall include a description of the land 23to be managed under the plan, a description of the types of 24timber to be grown, a projected harvest schedule, a   SB1837- 8 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1description of forest management practices to be applied to 2the land, an estimation of the cost of such practices, plans 3for afforestation, plans for regenerative harvest and 4reforestation, and a description of soil and water 5conservation goals and wildlife habitat enhancement which will 6be served by implementation of the forest management plan.7    Upon receipt from a timber grower of a draft forest 8management plan, the Department shall review the plan and, if 9necessary, assist the timber grower to revise the plan. The 10Department shall officially approve acceptable plans. Forest 11management plans shall be revised as necessary and all 12revisions must be approved by the Department. A plan shall be 13evaluated every 2 years for reapproval.14    The eligible land shall be maintained in a forest 15condition for a period of 10 years or until commercial 16harvest, whichever last occurs, as required by the plan.17    The Department shall enter into agreements with timber 18growers with approved forest management plans under which the 19Department shall agree to pay a share of the total cost of 20acceptable forest management plans and practices implemented 21under the plan. The cost share amount is up to 80% of the total 22cost of the forest management practices for such practices 23approved to be funded from monies appropriated for this 24purpose for subsequent fiscal years. Cost share funds shall be 25paid from monies appropriated to the Department by the General 26Assembly for that purpose from the Illinois Forestry   SB1837- 9 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1Development Fund or any other fund in the State Treasury. 2    Starting in 2025, the Department shall file a report in 3writing to the General Assembly on or before March 1 of each 4year with the following information from the preceding year: 5the total number of agreements entered into pursuant to this 6Section, the total amount of payments made pursuant to this 7Section from the Illinois Forestry Development Fund, and the 8total number of acres that were affected by the payments. 9    The Department, upon recommendations made to it by the 10Council, may provide for the categorization of forest 11management practices and determine an appropriate cost share 12percentage for each such category. Forest management practices 13submitted by timber growers on whose timber sales fees of 4% of 14the sale amount were paid as provided in Section 9a of the 15"Timber Buyers Licensing Act before the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly ", approved 17September 1, 1969, may be accorded a priority for approval 18within the assigned category. Such timber growers may receive 19a cost share amount which is increased above the amount for 20which they would otherwise qualify by an amount equal to the 21fees paid by the timber grower on sales occurring in the 2 22fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year in which 23the forest management practices are approved and funded; 24provided, however, that the total cost share amount shall not 25exceed the total cost of the approved forest management 26practices.  SB1837- 10 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1    Upon transfer of his or her right and interest in the land 2or a change in land use, the timber grower shall forfeit all 3rights to future payments and other benefits resulting from an 4approved plan and shall refund to the Department all payments 5received therefrom during the previous 10 years unless the 6transferee of any such land agrees with the Department to 7assume all obligations under the plan.8(Source: P.A. 103-795, eff. 8-9-24.) 9    (525 ILCS 15/7)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9107)10    Sec. 7. The Illinois Forestry Development Fund, a special 11fund in the State Treasury, is hereby created. The Department 12of Natural Resources shall pay into the Fund all fees and fines 13collected from timber buyers and landowners and operators 14pursuant to the "Timber Buyers Licensing Act", and the "Forest 15Products Transportation Act", all gifts, contributions, 16bequests, grants, donations, transfers, appropriations and all 17other revenues and receipts resulting from forestry programs, 18forest product sales, and operations of facilities not 19otherwise directed by State law and shall, except for the 20additional moneys deposited under Section 805-550 of the 21Department of Natural Resources (Conservation) Law of the 22Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, pay such moneys 23appropriated from the Fund to timber growers for 24implementation of acceptable forest management practices as 25provided in Section 5 of this Act. Moneys may be appropriated   SB1837- 11 -LRB104 04665 AAS 14692 b1from the Fund for the expenses of the Illinois Forestry 2Development Council. Ordinary operating expenses of the Forest 3Resources Division of the Department, for the administration 4and implementation of this Act, the development and 5implementation of a wood industry marketing, development and 6promotions program and other programs beneficial to advancing 7forests and forestry in this State, as deemed appropriate by 8the General Assembly, may be appropriated from this fund to 9the extent such appropriations preserve the receipts to the 10Fund derived from Section 9a of the "Timber Buyers Licensing 11Act before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly ".13(Source: P.A. 96-217, eff. 8-10-09; 96-545, eff. 8-17-09; 1496-1160, eff. 1-1-11.)